California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) The shipment contains not more than five gallons or pounds of contaminants combined, based on the contaminant concentrations and the total volume or weight of the shipment.

(c) In a calendar year, a certified used oil collection center, curbside collection program, or uncertified publicly funded used oil collection center in a small rural county shall be reimbursed for not more than one shipment and for not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in disposal costs for halogen-contaminated waste or not more than the actual net additional costs of disposing of polychlorinated biphenyl-contaminated wastes, subject to the availability of funds pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 10.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48661.

(a) On and after July 1, 1992, the department shall annually inspect used oil recycling facilities.

(b) Within 135 days following inspection, the department shall submit a report to the board, describing all of the following:

(1) Any violations of Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) Any corrective actions ordered or agreed to by the department. 

(3) Progress by the facility in correcting violations identified in previous inspections. 

(c) In the report required by subdivision (b), the department shall specifically state whether any of the following occurred:

(1) The department has identified violations of subdivision (c) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code regarding achievement of minimum standards of purity for recycled oil.

(2) The department has identified violations of regulations requiring financial responsibility assurance for liability, closure, and postclosure obligations. 

(3) Where prior contamination has been identified, the facility has an approved corrective action plan and has not been found to be in violation of its requirements.

(4) The department has identified violations that meet the criteria for class 1 violations, as defined in Section 66260.10 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1147, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48662.

(a) The board shall certify or recertify a used oil recycling facility located in this state for which the board has received a report from the department pursuant to Section 48661, unless the board determines that the facility is engaged in a repeating or recurring pattern of noncompliance that poses a significant threat to public health and safety or the environment.

(b) The board shall require an out-of-state recycling facility, that receives used oil from a California generator and to which a recycling incentive may be paid, to register with the board declaring under penalty of perjury that the facility is operating in substantial compliance with Part 279 (commencing with Section 279.1) of Title 40 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations. An out-of-state recycling facility registering with the board pursuant to this subdivision shall, upon request, provide the board or the department with a copy of any inspection report issued for the facility by, or any other enforcement related documents available to, the agency responsible for enforcing Part 279 (commencing with Section 279.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations at the facility.

(c) The board shall certify or recertify a rerefiner of used oil, which may be located in this state or be an out-of-state facility, for which the board has received a report from the department that the facility meets either of the following requirements:

(1) If the used oil recycling facility is located in this state, the used oil recycling facility is certified pursuant to subdivision (a) and produces rerefined base lubricant meeting the specifications
 in Section 48620.2.

(2) If the used oil recycling facility is an out-of-state facility, the facility demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department all of the following:

(A) The facility substantially meets the requirements in Part 279 (commencing with Section 279.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) The facility produces rerefined base lubricant meeting the specifications in Section 48620.2. An out-of-state recycling facility certified by the board pursuant to this subdivision shall, upon request, provide the board or the department with a copy of records demonstrating that the used oil has been recycled to meet the specifications for rerefined oil, as defined in Section 48620.2.

(d) An out-of-state facility that seeks
 certification shall, pursuant to subdivision (c), annually certify in writing to the board, under penalty of perjury, that the facility substantially meets the requirements in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) does not require the department to inspect or prohibit the department from inspecting an out-of-state facility to determine whether the department is satisfied that the facility substantially meets the requirements for certification.

(f) As a condition of demonstrating compliance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a facility shall enter into an agreement with the department pursuant to Section 25201.9 of the Health and Safety Code to pay the department’s full expenses of conducting the review and any inspection costs the department may incur in determining whether the facility meets the requirements for certification.

(g) If the board denies certification to a facility subject to subdivision (a) or (c), the board may subsequently certify the facility if it determines that the facility meets the standards for certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 11.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reporting [48670. - 48676.]

48670.

(a) To be eligible for payment of a recycling incentive, an industrial generator of used lubricating oil, a used oil collection center, or a curbside collection program shall report to the board, for each quarter, based on the following reporting limitations and requirements:

(1) The amount of lubricating oil purchased and the amount of used lubricating oil that is transported to a certified used oil recycling facility, to a used oil storage facility, or to a used oil transfer facility, or that is transported to an out-of-state recycling facility registered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48662 or certified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48662.

(2) The amount of used lubricating oil collected from the public, for use in determining the recycling incentive payment, that is transported to a certified used oil recycling facility, to a used oil storage facility, or to a used oil transfer facility, or that is transported to an out-of-state recycling facility registered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48662 or certified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48662.

(b) The reports shall be submitted on or before the 45th day following each quarter, in the form and manner that the board may prescribe, and shall include copies of manifests or modified manifest receipts from used oil haulers.

(c) The board may delegate to its executive officer the authority to accept reports submitted after the 45th day and to reduce, eliminate, or approve the
 amount of incentive fee to be paid due to the late submission of the report. The board may provide, by regulation, for a longer reporting period for industrial generators that generate less than 1,000 gallons of used oil annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 12.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48671.

Every oil manufacturer who sells, or offers to sell, lubricating or industrial oil in this state shall report to the board for each month the amount of lubricating or industrial oil sold. The reports shall be submitted by the day when payment required by Section 48650 is or would be due, in the form and manner which the board may prescribe. However, an oil manufacturer is not required to report to the board when the total volume of oil to be reported is five gallons or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 15.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48671.5.

The manufacturer of every container that contains lubricating oils or industrial oils, and which is intended for sale to consumers in California, shall do either of the following:

(a) Label the containers in at least seven-point typeface as follows:

“Used oil is generally classified as a hazardous waste in California. Do not dispose of used oil in garbage, sewers, or the ground. To find out how to properly recycle used oil in your area, call (800) ____.”

The toll-free telephone number on the label shall be the number maintained by the board pursuant to Section 48644.

(b) Provide signs or other written material to retailers appropriate for informing consumers of the information that would otherwise be contained in the label set forth in paragraph (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1147, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48672.

Beginning May 1, 1992, every used oil hauler shall report to the board for each quarter the amount of used oil transported, the location to which it is transported, and the source of the used oil. The hauler shall provide estimates, where feasible, of the amount which is used lubricating oil and the amount which is used industrial oil. The reports shall be submitted on or before the last day of the month following each quarter, in the form and manner which the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 16.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

48673.

(a) A used oil recycling facility issued a permit by the department to produce recycled oil, as defined in Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and an out-of-state recycling facility that is either registered with the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48662 or certified by the board pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48662, shall report to the board for each quarter the amount of California used oil received and its disposition, including the volume of any resultant product.

(b) A facility subject to this section shall provide estimates, where feasible, of the amount that is used lubricating oil and the amount that is used industrial oil.

(c) The reports required by this section shall be submitted on or before the last day of the month following each quarter, in the form and manner that the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 13.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48674.

After receiving payments pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653, each local government shall submit an annual report to the board, in the manner specified by the board, that includes any revision to the local used oil collection program adopted pursuant to Section 48690, a description of all measures taken to implement the program, and a description of how payments were expended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 14.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48675.

The board shall establish procedures to protect any proprietary information concerning sales, purchases, and operations obtained while collecting information for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

48676.

The board shall make available on its Internet Web site an annual report that includes the accumulated industrial and lubricating oil sales and used oil recycling rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 15.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Enforcement [48680. - 48680.]

48680.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, any person convicted of a violation of this chapter is guilty of an infraction, which is punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day the violation occurs.

(b) (1) Every person who, with intent to defraud, does not accurately report the amount of oil sold, collected, or transferred pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 48670), who, with intent to defraud, does not make payments as required by Section 48650, or who knowingly receives or pays a recycling incentive for oil upon which a payment has not been made pursuant
 to Section 48650 is guilty of fraud. If the money obtained or withheld is four hundred dollars ($400) or less, the fraud is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. If the money obtained or withheld is more than four hundred dollars ($400), the fraud is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or twice the late or unmade payments plus interest, whichever is greater, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Any person who claims an exemption pursuant to this chapter which the person knows to be false, and makes that claim for the purpose of willfully evading the payment of any fee imposed pursuant to this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor
 punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year. The person shall also be subject to payment of a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The fine shall be distributed as follows:

(A) Fifty percent to the local jurisdiction which undertook the prosecution.

(B) Fifty percent to the General Fund.

(c) Any person who violates this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the board of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day the violation occurs or continues, pursuant to a hearing and notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 560.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Local Used Oil Collection Program [48690. - 48691.]

48690.

A local government is eligible for a payment pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653, if it develops and submits a local used oil collection program to the board pursuant to Section 48691 and files a report pursuant to Section 48674. The board shall make a payment to every local government that submits a program and files a report unless the board finds that the program or its implementation does not comply with criteria contained in this article. The board may make a payment to another entity that will implement the program of a local government in lieu of making a payment to that local government with the concurrence of that local government. A payment issued by the board pursuant to this section may take the form of an advance payment. If a local government does not implement a used oil
 collection program or chooses not to accept the payment pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48653, the board may allocate that local government’s payment to another local government that commits to implementing a used oil collection program pursuant to Section 48691 and serving the residents of the nonparticipating local government, if any program implemented within the boundaries of the nonparticipating jurisdiction is approved by the nonparticipating jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 24.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48691.

(a) A local used oil collection program shall provide for used lubricating oil collection by either of the following or a combination of the two:

(1) Ensuring that at least one certified used oil collection center is available for every 100,000 residents not served by curbside used oil collection, that accepts oil from the public at no charge, during the hours the center is open for business.

(2) Providing used oil curbside collection at least once a month.

(b) A local used oil collection program shall include a public education program that informs the public of locally available used oil
 recycling opportunities.

(c) A local government may implement its used oil collection program in conjunction with other similar programs in order to improve used oil recycling efficiency.

(d) A local government that has implemented the used oil collection and education elements of subdivisions (a) and (b) may also include, in the local used oil collection program one or both of the following:

(1) Provisions for the mitigation and the collection of oil and oil byproducts, including other solid waste that may be mixed with oil or oil byproducts from stormwater runoff, including devices to capture that stormwater runoff, such as the use of storm drain inlet filter devices. A local government shall not receive a payment pursuant to Section 48690 for the purposes identified pursuant to this paragraph unless the local
 government certifies that it has a stormwater management program that is approved by the appropriate California regional water quality control board and that the provisions in the local used oil collection program approved for funding under this paragraph are consistent with that approved stormwater management program.

(2) A used oil filter collection and recycling program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 504, Sec. 16.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Paint Product Recovery Program [48700. - 48707.]

48700.

The purpose of the paint product recovery program established pursuant to this chapter is to require paint manufacturers to develop and implement a program to collect, transport, and process postconsumer paint to reduce the costs and environmental impacts of the disposal of postconsumer paint in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 8.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48701.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Aerosol coating product” means a pressurized coating product containing pigments or resins dispensed by means of a propellant and packaged and sold in a disposable aerosol container for handheld application, or for use in specialized equipment for ground traffic or marking applications.

(2) “Aerosol coating product” does not include paint thinner, paint remover, graffiti remover, caulking compounds that contain no appreciable level of opaque fillers or pigments, products subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 94500) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 94507) of Subchapter 8.5 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, or other nonaerosol coating products not regulated under Article 3 (commencing with Section 94520) of Subchapter 8.5 of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) “Coating-related product” means a product used as a paint thinner, paint colorant, paint additive, paint remover, surface sealant, surface preparation, or surface adhesive and sold for home improvement. For purposes of this subdivision, “home improvement” has the same meaning as defined in Section 7151 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) “Consumer” means a purchaser or owner of a paint product, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and
 Recovery.

(e) “Distributor” means a person that has a contractual relationship with one or more manufacturers to market and sell paint products to retailers.

(f) “Manufacturer” means a manufacturer of a paint product.

(g) “Nonindustrial coating” means arts and crafts paint, automotive refinish paint, driveway sealer, faux finish or glaze, furniture oil, furniture paint, lime wash, lime paint, marine paint, antifouling paint, road and traffic marking paint, two-component paint, wood preservative, fire retardant paint, dry fog paint, chalkboard paint, and conductive paint, sold in containers of five gallons or less for commercial and homeowner use, but does not include coatings purchased for industrial or original equipment manufacturer use.

(h) (1) “Paint product” includes all of the following:

(A) Interior and exterior architectural coatings, sold in containers of five gallons or less for commercial or homeowner use, but does not include coatings purchased for industrial or original equipment manufacturer use.

(B) Aerosol coating products.

(C) Nonindustrial coatings and coating-related products sold in containers of five gallons or less for commercial or homeowner use, but does not include products purchased for industrial or original equipment manufacturer use.

(2) “Paint product” does not include a health and beauty product.

(i) “Permanent collection site” means a permanent location in the state where discarded
 paint products may be returned at no cost, by a consumer or another party on behalf of a consumer, to be reused or otherwise managed.

(j) “Postconsumer paint” means a paint product not used by the purchaser.

(k) “Retailer” means a person that sells paint products in the state to a consumer. For purposes of this subdivision, a sale includes, but is not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet or any other similar electronic means.

(l) “Stewardship organization” means an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and formed for the purpose of implementing a stewardship plan to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(m) “Stewardship
 plan” means a plan developed by a stewardship organization that meets the requirements of Sections 48703.1, 48703.2, 48703.3, and 48703.4, and is submitted to the department for approval pursuant to Section 48703.

(n) “Temporary collection site” means a temporary location in the state where discarded paint products may be returned at no cost, by a consumer or another party on behalf of a consumer, to be reused or otherwise managed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 9.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48701.1.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Any regulations implementing this chapter as of January 1, 2025, shall remain in effect until they are amended or superseded by regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(b) Aerosol coating products, coating-related products, and nonindustrial coatings shall not be subject to the requirements of this chapter until the implementation date of a stewardship plan or an amendment to a stewardship plan concerning the applicable product is approved by the department, or January 1, 2028, whichever occurs sooner. The department
 may authorize an extension of this implementation if the department determines the extension is necessary to implement the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 10.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48702.

(a) To comply with the requirements of this chapter, a manufacturer shall establish and implement a stewardship program, either by itself or as part of a group of manufacturers participating in the stewardship organization.

(b) No later than 30 days after the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to Section 48701.1, each manufacturer, or a stewardship organization on behalf of the manufacturers participating in the stewardship organization, shall notify the department, in writing, that the manufacturer has registered or intends to register with the stewardship organization in accordance with the procedures and requirements established by the stewardship organization and will comply with those procedures and requirements.

(c) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this chapter, a stewardship organization shall provide to the department, in a form and manner established by the department, all of the following:

(1) A list of all participating manufacturers and their contact information, including names, physical and mailing addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.

(2) A list of paint products and brands of paint products that each participating manufacturer sells, distributes for sale, imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the state. The list shall be disaggregated according to manufacturer or retailer.

(d) Each participating manufacturer shall update the information described in subdivision (c) and provide the updated information to the
 stewardship organization on or before January 15 of each year, within 30 days of changes to the information, and upon request of the department.

(e) A manufacturer registered with the stewardship organization with an approved stewardship plan shall comply with the approved stewardship plan.

(f) The stewardship organization shall notify the department within 30 calendar days of any the following:

(1) The end of any three-month period in which the stewardship organization unsuccessfully attempted to obtain a fee, records, or information from a participating manufacturer, or received incomplete or incorrect records or information required by this chapter.

(2) The date a manufacturer no longer participates in the stewardship organization’s approved
 stewardship plan.

(3) Any instance of noncompliance by a participating manufacturer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 12.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.

(a) Within 12 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 48701.1, a manufacturer shall, individually or through a stewardship organization, submit to the department either of the following in a form and manner determined by the department:

(1) A stewardship plan to accept and manage all postconsumer paint products.

(2) Amendments to an approved stewardship plan to include all paint products.

(b) (1) The department shall review the stewardship plan for compliance with this chapter and may approve or disapprove the stewardship plan within 120 days
 upon receipt.

(2) The department shall approve the stewardship plan if it provides for the establishment of a stewardship program that meets the requirements of Sections 48703.1, 48703.2, 48703.3, and 48703.4.

(3) If the department disapproves a stewardship plan or amendments to an approved stewardship plan, the department shall explain how the stewardship plan or the amendments to an approved stewardship plan do not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the stewardship organization or manufacturer within 60 days of disapproval.

(4) The stewardship organization or manufacturer may resubmit to the department a revised stewardship plan within 30 days of the date the written notice was provided, and the department shall review the revised stewardship plan within 60 days of its receipt of the
 resubmittal.

(5) Within 24 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 48701.1, the stewardship organization shall have a complete stewardship plan approved by the department and each manufacturer shall be subject to an approved stewardship plan to be compliant with this chapter.

(c) An approved stewardship plan shall be a public record, except that financial, production, or sales data reported to the department by a manufacturer or the stewardship organization is not a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall not be open to public inspection. The department may release financial, production, or sales data in summary form only so information cannot be attributable to a specific producer or to any other entity.

(d) A manufacturer shall, individually or through a stewardship organization, implement the approved stewardship plan within 12 months of the department’s approval of the stewardship plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 14.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.1.

(a) The stewardship plan shall demonstrate sufficient funding for the stewardship program, including a funding mechanism for securing and disbursing funds to fully cover administrative, operational, and capital costs, including the assessment of charges on paint products covered by the program and sold by manufacturers in this state.

(b) Administrative costs shall include the department’s actual and reasonable regulatory costs, which include full personnel costs, to implement and enforce this chapter as the criteria for all the costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 48701.1. For purposes of this subdivision, implementation begins once the department approves the stewardship plan, except the department’s costs include
 actual regulatory development costs and other startup costs incurred before the submittal of a stewardship plan and approval of a stewardship plan.

(c) The funding mechanism shall include the stewardship assessment required by Section 48704.1 and a description of how it is calculated.

(d) The funding mechanism shall include a budget that establishes a funding level sufficient to operate the stewardship organization, as applicable, in a prudent and responsible manner. The budget shall demonstrate how estimated revenues will cover all budgeted costs for each cost category. Budgeted costs may include, but are not be limited to, administrative costs, education and outreach costs, operational costs, and capital costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 15.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.2.

The stewardship plan shall include quantifiable time-specific performance goals established by the manufacturer or stewardship organization to reduce the generation of postconsumer paint, to promote the reuse of postconsumer paint, and for the proper end-of-life management of postconsumer paint, including collection, recovery, and recycling of postconsumer paint, as practical, based on household hazardous waste program information. The goals may be revised by the manufacturer or stewardship organization based on the information collected for the annual report pursuant to Section 48705.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 16.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.3.

(a) The stewardship plan shall describe how the manufacturer, individually or through a stewardship organization, will provide a free dropoff and convenient collection system for paint products, which shall include approved collection sites.

(b) The stewardship plan shall address the coordination of the stewardship program with existing local household hazardous waste collection programs as much as is reasonably feasible and is mutually agreeable between those programs.

(c) Approved collection sites shall meet all the conditions in Sections 25217.2 and 25217.2.1 of the Health and Safety Code for oil-based or recyclable latex paints, and Section 25201.16 of the Health and Safety
 Code for aerosol paint containers.

(d) The manufacturer shall, individually or through a stewardship organization, include as an approved collection site under its stewardship plan any retailer that offers in writing to voluntarily participate in the stewardship plan and agrees to comply with any requirements that are consistent with the stewardship plan.

(e) A manufacturer may, individually or through a stewardship organization, suspend or terminate use of an approved collection site that does not comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws and regulations or adhere to the rules and conditions imposed by the stewardship organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 17.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.4.

A stewardship plan shall include consumer, contractor, and retailer education and outreach efforts to promote the source reduction and recycling of paint products. This information may include, but is not limited to, developing, and updating as necessary, educational and other outreach materials for retailers of paint products. These materials shall be made available to retailers. These materials may include, but are not limited to, one or more of the following:

(a) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the consumer.

(b) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction by retailers to be provided to the consumer at the time of purchase or delivery, or both. Written
 materials shall include information on the prohibition of improper disposal of paint products.

(c) Advertising or other promotional materials, or both, that include references to paint product recycling opportunities.

(d) An internet website that publicizes the location of approved collection sites and provides information on how to access and drop off paint products at the free and convenient network of approved collection sites offered by the stewardship organization.

(e) All signage and materials required for approved collection sites by the stewardship organization, and a description of the method by which approved collection sites can access replacement materials at no cost to the approved collection site.

(f) A description of efforts to support
 participation by all California communities, including a description of efforts to communicate in languages other than English.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 18.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48703.5.

(a) A manufacturer shall, individually or through a stewardship organization, review its stewardship plan at least once every five years after approval by the department and determine whether amendments to the stewardship plan are necessary.

(b) If a manufacturer or stewardship organization determines that amendments are necessary, the manufacturer or stewardship organization shall submit to the department an amended stewardship plan for review and approval consistent with Section 48703. The manufacturer or stewardship organization shall submit the amended stewardship plan at least 12 months before the deadline described in subdivision (a). The amended stewardship plan shall include a cover letter that summarizes the amendments.

(c) If a manufacturer or stewardship organization determines that no amendments to a stewardship plan are necessary, the manufacturer or stewardship organization shall send a letter to the department, no later than 12 months before the review deadline described in subdivision (a), explaining that the manufacturer or stewardship organization has reviewed the stewardship plan and determined that no amendments are needed.

(d) The department may disapprove a manufacturer or stewardship organization’s determination within 30 days of receipt of that determination if the department concludes that the manufacturer or stewardship organization cannot implement the objectives of this chapter without amending its stewardship plan. In the event the department disapproves a manufacturer or stewardship organization’s determination, the manufacturer or stewardship organization shall submit to the
 department an amended stewardship plan for review and approval. The manufacturer or stewardship organization shall submit the amended stewardship plan within 60 days of receipt of the department’s disapproval, unless the department determines that additional time is needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 19.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48704.

(a) No later than 90 days before a stewardship plan is required to be submitted to the department, the department shall notify each manufacturer acting individually and each stewardship organization of its reasonable regulatory costs, including its full personnel costs, related to implementing and enforcing this chapter. This shall include the actual and reasonable costs associated with regulation development pursuant to Section 48701.1 and other startup activities before the stewardship plan is submitted and approved.

(b) Manufacturers and stewardship organizations shall collectively pay on a quarterly basis the department’s administrative fee for its reasonably incurred regulatory costs, as described in subdivision (a). Manufacturer and stewardship organizations
 shall pay the fee on or before the last day of the month following the end of each quarter.

(c) The Architectural Paint Stewardship Account, established pursuant to Section 48704.1, as it read on January 1, 2024, in the Integrated Waste Management Fund created pursuant to Section 40135, is hereby renamed the Paint Product Stewardship Account. The Architectural Paint Stewardship Penalty Subaccount, established in that fund pursuant to Section 48704.1, as it read on January 1, 2024, is hereby renamed the Paint Product Stewardship Penalty Subaccount. The renamed account and subaccount shall remain in the fund.

(d) All fees collected by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Paint Product Stewardship Account and may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the department’s reasonable costs to implement this chapter and
 to reimburse any outstanding loans made from other funds used to finance regulation development and startup costs of the department’s activities pursuant to this chapter. The moneys in the Paint Product Stewardship Account shall not be expended for any other purpose. The department shall enforce this chapter.

(e) All civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the Paint Product Stewardship Penalty Subaccount and may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the department’s reasonable costs to implement this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 989, Sec. 20.   (SB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48704.1.

(a) A stewardship organization’s funding mechanism shall provide a stewardship assessment for each container of a paint product and sold by manufacturers in this state, and the assessment shall be remitted to the stewardship organization, if applicable.

(b) The stewardship assessment shall be added to the cost of all paint products sold to California retailers and distributors, and each California retailer or distributor shall add the assessment to the purchase price of all paint products covered by the program sold in the state.
